Florida, session 2026, SB1666.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 137 138 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) and subsection 139 (5) of section 20.165, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 140 20.165âDepartment of Business and Professional Regulation. 141 There is created a Department of Business and Professional 142 Regulation. 143 (4)(a)âThe following boards, and programs, commissions, and 144 councils are established within the Division of Professions: 145 1.âBoard of Architecture and Interior Design, created under 146 part I of chapter 481. 147 2.âFlorida Board of Auctioneers, created under part VI of 148 chapter 468. 149 3.âBarbersâ Board, created under chapter 476. 150 4.âFlorida Building Code Administrators and Inspectors 151 Board, created under part XII of chapter 468. 152 5.âConstruction Industry Licensing Board, created under 153 part I of chapter 489. 154 6.âBoard of Cosmetology, created under chapter 477. 155 7.âElectrical Contractorsâ Licensing Board, created under 156 part II of chapter 489. 157 8.âBoard of Employee Leasing Companies, created under part 158 XI of chapter 468. 159 9.âBoard of Landscape Architecture, created under part II 160 of chapter 481. 161 10.âBoard of Pilot Commissioners, created under chapter 162 310. 163 11.âBoard of Professional Engineers, created under chapter 164 471. 165 12.âBoard of Professional Geologists, created under chapter 166 492. 167 13.âBoard of Veterinary Medicine, created under chapter 168 474. 169 14.âHome inspection services licensing program, created 170 under part XV of chapter 468. 171 15.âMold-related services licensing program, created under 172 part XVI of chapter 468. 173 16.âTalent agency licensing program, created under part VII 174 of chapter 468. 175 17.âFlorida Building Commission, created under chapter 553. 176 18.âRegulatory Council of Community Association Managers, 177 created under part VIII of chapter 468. 178 19.âYacht and ship brokers licensing program, created under 179 chapter 326. 180 (5)âThe members of each board, commission, or council 181 established pursuant to subsection (4) shall be appointed by the 182 Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. Consumer 183 members on the board, commission, or council are shall be 184 appointed pursuant to subsection (6). Members are shall be 185 appointed for 4-year terms, and such terms shall expire on 186 October 31. However, a term of less than 4 years may be used 187 utilized to ensure that: 188 (a)âNo more than two membersâ terms expire during the same 189 calendar year for boards consisting of seven or eight members. 190 (b)âNo more than 3 membersâ terms expire during the same 191 calendar year for boards consisting of 9 to 12 members. 192 (c)âNo more than 5 membersâ terms expire during the same 193 calendar year for boards consisting of 13 or more members. 194 195 A member whose term has expired continues shall continue to 196 serve on the board until such time as a replacement is 197 appointed. A vacancy on the board is shall be filled for the 198 unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as the original 199 appointment. No member may serve for more than the remaining 200 portion of a previous memberâs unexpired term, plus two 201 consecutive 4-year terms of the memberâs own appointment 202 thereafter. 203 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 326.002, Florida 204 Statutes, is amended to read: 205 326.002âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 326.001-326.006, the 206 term: 207 (2)ââDivisionâ means the Division of Professions Florida 208 Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes of the Department of 209 Business and Professional Regulation. 210 Section 3.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) and subsection 211 (3) of section 326.006, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 212 326.006âPowers and duties of division.â 213 (2)âThe division has the power to enforce and ensure 214 compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted 215 under this chapter relating to the sale and ownership of yachts 216 and ships. In performing its duties, the division has the 217 following powers and duties: 218 (d)âNotwithstanding any remedies available to a yacht or 219 ship purchaser, if the division has reasonable cause to believe 220 that a violation of any provision of this chapter or rule 221 adopted under this chapter has occurred, the division may 222 institute enforcement proceedings in its own name against any 223 broker or salesperson or any of his or her assignees or agents, 224 or against any unlicensed person or any of his or her assignees 225 or agents, as follows: 226 1.âThe division may permit a person whose conduct or 227 actions are under investigation to waive formal proceedings and 228 enter into a consent proceeding whereby orders, rules, or 229 letters of censure or warning, whether formal or informal, may 230 be entered against the person. 231 2.âThe division may issue an order requiring the broker or 232 salesperson or any of his or her assignees or agents, or 233 requiring any unlicensed person or any of his or her assignees 234 or agents, to cease and desist from the unlawful practice and 235 take such affirmative action as in the judgment of the division 236 will carry out the purposes of this chapter. 237 3.âThe division may bring an action in circuit court on 238 behalf of a class of yacht or ship purchasers for declaratory 239 relief, injunctive relief, or restitution. 240 4.âThe division may impose a civil penalty against a broker 241 or salesperson or any of his or her assignees or agents, or 242 against an unlicensed person or any of his or her assignees or 243 agents, for any violation of this chapter or a rule adopted 244 under this chapter. A penalty may be imposed for each day of 245 continuing violation, but in no event may the penalty for any 246 offense exceed $10,000. All amounts collected must be deposited 247 with the Chief Financial Officer to the credit of the 248 Professional Regulation Division of Florida Condominiums, 249 Timeshares, and Mobile Homes Trust Fund. If a broker, 250 salesperson, or unlicensed person working for a broker, fails to 251 pay the civil penalty, the division must shall issue an order 252 suspending the brokerâs license until such time as the civil 253 penalty is paid or may pursue enforcement of the penalty in a 254 court of competent jurisdiction. The order imposing the civil 255 penalty or the order of suspension may not become effective 256 until 20 days after the date of such order. Any action commenced 257 by the division must be brought in the county in which the 258 division has its executive offices or in the county where the 259 violation occurred. 260 (3)âAll fees must be deposited in the Professional 261 Regulation Division of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and 262 Mobile Homes Trust Fund as provided by law. 263 Section 4.âSubsection (2) of section 399.035, Florida 264 Statutes, is amended to read: 265 399.035âElevator accessibility requirements for the 266 physically handicapped.â 267 (2)âAny building that is more than three stories high or in 268 which the vertical distance between the bottom terminal landing 269 and the top terminal landing exceeds 25 feet must be constructed 270 to contain at least one passenger elevator that is operational 271 and will accommodate the an ambulance stretcher size specified 272 in the Florida Building Code edition that was in effect at the 273 time of receipt of application for the construction permit for 274 the elevator 76 inches long and 24 inches wide in the horizontal 275 position. 276 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 277 455.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 278 455.02âLicensure of members of the Armed Forces in good 279 standing and their spouses or surviving spouses with 280 administrative boards or programs.â 281 (3)(a)âThe department shall issue a professional license to 282 an applicant who is or was an active duty member of the Armed 283 Forces of the United States, or who is a spouse or surviving 284 spouse of such member, upon application to the department in a 285 format prescribed by the department. An application must include 286 proof that: 287 1.âThe applicant is or was an active duty member of the 288 Armed Forces of the United States or is married to a member of 289 the Armed Forces of the United States and was married to the 290 member during any period of active duty or was married to such a 291 member who at the time of the memberâs death was serving on 292 active duty. An applicant who was an active duty member of the 293 Armed Forces of the United States must have received an 294 honorable discharge upon separation or discharge from the Armed 295 Forces of the United States. 296 2.âThe applicant holds a valid license for the profession 297 issued by another state, the District of Columbia, any 298 possession or territory of the United States, or any foreign 299 jurisdiction. 300 3.âThe applicant, where required by the specific practice 301 act, has complied with insurance or bonding requirements. 302 4.a.âA complete set of the applicantâs fingerprints is 303 submitted to the Department of Law Enforcement for a statewide 304 criminal history check for those professions that require 305 fingerprints for initial licensure. 306 b.âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall forward the 307 fingerprints submitted pursuant to sub-subparagraph a. to the 308 Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history 309 check. The department shall, and the board may, review the 310 results of the criminal history checks according to the level 2 311 screening standards in s. 435.04 and determine whether the 312 applicant meets the licensure requirements. The costs of 313 fingerprint processing shall be borne by the applicant. If the 314 applicantâs fingerprints are submitted through an authorized 315 agency or vendor, the agency or vendor shall collect the 316 required processing fees and remit the fees to the Department of 317 Law Enforcement. 318 Section 6.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (3) and 319 subsection (12) of section 455.213, Florida Statutes, are 320 amended to read: 321 455.213âGeneral licensing provisions.â 322 (3)(a)âNotwithstanding any other law, the applicable board 323 shall use the process in this subsection for review of an 324 applicantâs criminal record to determine his or her eligibility 325 for licensure as: 326 1.âA barber under chapter 476; 327 2.âA cosmetologist or cosmetology specialist under chapter 328 477; 329 3.âAny of the following construction professions under 330 chapter 489: 331 a.âAir-conditioning contractor; 332 b.âElectrical contractor; 333 c.âMechanical contractor; 334 d.âPlumbing contractor; 335 e.âPollutant storage systems contractor; 336 f.âRoofing contractor; 337 g.âSheet metal contractor; 338 h.âSolar contractor; 339 i.âSwimming pool and spa contractor; 340 j.âUnderground utility and excavation contractor; or 341 k.âOther specialty contractors; or 342 3.4.âAny other profession for which the department issues a 343 license, provided the profession is offered to inmates in any 344 correctional institution or correctional facility as vocational 345 training or through an industry certification program. 346 (b)1.âA conviction, or any other adjudication, for a crime 347 more than 5 years before the date the application is received by 348 the applicable board may not be grounds for denial of a license 349 specified in paragraph (a). For purposes of this paragraph, the 350 term âconvictionâ means a determination of guilt that is the 351 result of a plea or trial, regardless of whether adjudication is 352 withheld. This paragraph does not limit the applicable board 353 from considering an applicantâs criminal history that includes a 354 crime listed in s. 775.21(4)(a)1. or s. 776.08 at any time, but 355 only if such criminal history has been found to relate to the 356 practice of the applicable profession. 357 2.âThe applicable board may consider the criminal history 358 of an applicant for licensure under subparagraph (a)2. 359 subparagraph (a)3. if such criminal history has been found to 360 relate to good moral character. 361 (12)(a)âA person or an entity licensed or permitted by the 362 Division of Professions or the Division of Real Estate, or 363 applying for a license or a permit, must create and maintain an 364 account with the departmentâs online system and provide an e 365 mail address to the department to function as the primary means 366 of contact for all communication by the department to the 367 licensee, permitholder, or applicant. Licensees, permitholders, 368 and applicants are responsible for maintaining accurate contact 369 information on file with the department. A person or an entity 370 seeking a license or a permit under this chapter or under the 371 applicable practice act must apply using forms furnished by the 372 department which are filed through the departmentâs online 373 system before the person or entity commences operations. The 374 department may not process an application for a license or a 375 permit issued by the department under this chapter or under the 376 applicable practice act unless the application is submitted 377 through the departmentâs online system Any submission required 378 to be in writing may otherwise be required by the department to 379 be made by electronic means. 380 (b)âThe department is authorized to contract with private 381 vendors, or enter into interagency agreements, to collect 382 electronic fingerprints where fingerprints are required for 383 registration, certification, or the licensure process or where 384 criminal history record checks are required. 385 Section 7.âSubsection (3) of section 471.015, Florida 386 Statutes, is amended to read: 387 471.015âLicensure.â 388 (3)âThe board shall certify as qualified for a license by 389 endorsement an applicant who: 390 (a)âQualifies to take the fundamentals examination and the 391 principles and practice examination as set forth in s. 471.013, 392 has passed a United States national, regional, state, or 393 territorial licensing examination that is substantially 394 equivalent to the fundamentals examination and principles and 395 practice examination required by s. 471.013, and has satisfied 396 the experience requirements set forth in paragraph (2)(a) and s. 397 471.013; or 398 (b)âHolds a valid license to practice engineering issued by 399 another state or territory of the United States, if the criteria 400 for issuance of the license were substantially the same as the 401 licensure criteria that existed in this state at the time the 402 license was issued; or 403 (c)âHolds a valid license to practice engineering issued by 404 a foreign jurisdiction approved by the board and holds an active 405 council record with the National Council of Examiners for 406 Engineering and Surveying. 407 Section 8.âSection 473.3065, Florida Statutes, is amended 408 to read: 409 473.3065âClay Ford Scholarship Program; Certified Public 410 Accountant Education Opportunity Minority Assistance Advisory 411 Council.â 412 (1)âThe Clay Ford Scholarship Program for Florida residents 413 is hereby established in the division for the purpose of 414 providing scholarships to minority persons as defined in s. 415 288.703 who are students enrolled in their fifth year of an 416 accounting education program at an institution in this state 417 approved by the board by rule. A Certified Public Accountant 418 Education Opportunity Minority Assistance Advisory Council shall 419 assist the board in administering the program. 420 (2)âAll moneys used to provide scholarships under the Clay 421 Ford Scholarship Program shall be funded by a portion of 422 existing license fees, as set by the board, not to exceed $10 423 per license. Such moneys shall be deposited into the 424 Professional Regulation Trust Fund in a separate account 425 maintained for that purpose. The department may spend up to 426 $200,000 per year for the program from this program account but 427 may not allocate overhead charges to it. Moneys for scholarships 428 shall be disbursed twice per year upon recommendation of the 429 advisory council and approval by the board, based on the adopted 430 eligibility criteria and comparative evaluation of all 431 applicants. Funds in the program account may be invested by the 432 Chief Financial Officer under the same limitations as apply to 433 investment of other state funds, and all interest earned thereon 434 shall be credited to the program account. 435 (3)âThe board shall adopt rules as necessary for 436 administration of the Clay Ford Scholarship Program, including 437 rules relating to the following: 438 (a)âEligibility criteria for receipt of a scholarship, 439 which, at a minimum, shall include the following factors: 440 1.âFinancial need. 441 2.âEthnic, gender, or racial minority status pursuant to s. 442 288.703(4). 443 3.âScholastic ability and performance. 444 (b)âScholarship application procedures. 445 (c)âAmounts in which scholarships may be provided, the 446 total amount that may be provided, the timeframe for payments or 447 partial payments, and criteria for how scholarship funds may be 448 expended. 449 (d)âThe total amount of scholarships that can be made each 450 year. 451 (e)âThe minimum balance that must be maintained in the 452 program account. 453 (4)âDeterminations made by the board regarding recipients 454 of scholarship moneys may shall not be considered agency action 455 for purposes of chapter 120. 456 (5)âIt is unlawful for any person or agent of such person 457 to knowingly file with the board any notice, statement, or other 458 document that is false or that contains any material 459 misstatement of fact. A person who violates this subsection 460 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as 461 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 462 (6)âThere is hereby created the Certified Public Accountant 463 Education Opportunity Minority Assistance Advisory Council to 464 assist the board in administering the Clay Ford Scholarship 465 Program. The council shall be diverse and representative of the 466 gender, ethnic, and racial categories set forth in s. 467 288.703(4). 468 (a)âThe council shall consist of five licensed Florida 469 certified public accountants selected by the board, of whom one 470 shall be a board member who serves as chair of the council, one 471 shall be a representative of the National Association of Black 472 Accountants, one shall be a representative of the Cuban American 473 CPA Association, and two shall be selected at large. At least 474 one member of the council must be a woman. 475 (b)âThe board shall determine the terms for initial 476 appointments and appointments thereafter. 477 (c)âAny vacancy on the council shall be filled in the 478 manner provided for the selection of the initial member. Any 479 member appointed to fill a vacancy of an unexpired term shall be 480 appointed for the remainder of that term. 481 (d)âThree consecutive absences or absences constituting 50 482 percent or more of the councilâs meetings within any 12-month 483 period shall cause the council membership of the member in 484 question to become void, and the position shall be considered 485 vacant. 486 (e)âThe members of the council shall serve without 487 compensation, and any necessary and actual expenses incurred by 488 a member while engaged in the business of the council shall be 489 borne by such member or by the organization or agency such 490 member represents. However, the council member who is a member 491 of the board shall be compensated in accordance with ss. 492 455.207(4) and 112.061. 493 Section 9.âSection 475.628, Florida Statutes, is amended to 494 read: 495 475.628âProfessional standards for appraisers registered, 496 licensed, or certified under this part.â 497 (1)âThe board shall adopt rules establishing standards of 498 professional practice which meet or exceed nationally recognized 499 standards of appraisal practice, including standards adopted by 500 the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation, 501 except for those standards that otherwise violate the laws of 502 this state. Each appraiser registered, licensed, or certified 503 under this part must comply with the rules, except for those 504 rules that otherwise violate the laws of this state. Statements 505 on appraisal standards which may be issued for the purpose of 506 clarification, interpretation, explanation, or elaboration 507 through the Appraisal Foundation are binding on any appraiser 508 registered, licensed, or certified under this part, upon 509 adoption by rule of the board. 510 (2)âThe board may adopt rules establishing standards of 511 professional practice other than standards adopted by the 512 Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation for 513 nonfederally related transactions. The board shall require that 514 when performing an appraisal or appraisal service for any 515 purpose other than a federally related transaction, an appraiser 516 must comply with the Ethics and Competency Rules of the 517 standards adopted by the Appraisal Standards Board of the 518 Appraisal Foundation, and other requirements as determined by 519 rule of the board. An assignment completed using alternate 520 standards does not satisfy the experience requirements under s. 521 475.617 unless the assignment complies with the standards 522 adopted by the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal 523 Foundation. 524 Section 10.âSubsection (3) of section 476.034, Florida 525 Statutes, is amended to read: 526 476.034âDefinitions.âAs used in this act: 527 (3)ââBarbershopâ means a licensed any place of business 528 wherein the practice of barbering is carried on. 529 Section 11.âSubsection (4) of section 476.054, Florida 530 Statutes, is amended to read: 531 476.054âBarbersâ Board.â 532 (4)âNo person shall be appointed to serve more than two 533 consecutive terms. Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment by 534 the Governor for the unexpired portion of the term. 535 Section 12.âSubsection (3) of section 476.064, Florida 536 Statutes, is amended to read: 537 476.064âOrganization; headquarters; personnel; meetings.â 538 (3)âThe board shall hold an annual meeting and such other 539 meetings during the year as it may determine to be necessary. 540 The chair of the board may call other meetings at her or his 541 discretion. A quorum of the board shall consist of not less than 542 four members. 543 Section 13.âSection 476.184, Florida Statutes, is amended 544 to read: 545 476.184âBarbershop licensure; requirements; fee; 546 inspection; license display; mobile barbershops.â 547 (1)âA No barbershop may not shall be permitted to operate 548 without a license issued by the department. 549 (2)âThe board shall adopt rules governing the licensure and 550 operation of a barbershop and its facilities, personnel, safety 551 and sanitary requirements, and the license application and 552 granting process. 553 (3)âAny person, firm, or corporation desiring to operate a 554 barbershop in the state shall submit to the department an 555 application upon forms provided by the department and 556 accompanied by any relevant information requested by the 557 department and by an application fee. 558 (4)âUpon receiving the application, the department may 559 cause an investigation to be made of the proposed barbershop. 560 (5)âWhen an applicant fails to meet all the requirements 561 provided in this section, the department shall deny the 562 application in writing and shall list the specific requirements 563 not met. An No applicant denied licensure because of failure to 564 meet the requirements of this section may not shall be precluded 565 from reapplying for licensure. 566 (6)âWhen the department determines that the proposed 567 barbershop meets the requirements set forth in this section, the 568 department shall grant the license upon such conditions as it 569 deems proper and upon payment of the original licensing fee. 570 (7)âA No license for operation of a barbershop may not be 571 transferred from the name of the original licensee to another. 572 It may be transferred from one location to another only after 573 inspection and approval by the department, which approval may 574 shall not be unreasonably withheld, and payment of a $125 575 transfer fee. 576 (8)âRenewal of license registration for barbershops must 577 shall be accomplished pursuant to rules adopted by the board. 578 The board is further authorized to adopt rules governing 579 delinquent renewal of licenses and may impose penalty fees for 580 delinquent renewal. 581 (9)âThe board is authorized to adopt rules governing the 582 operation and periodic inspection of barbershops licensed under 583 this chapter. 584 (10)âEach barbershop shall display, in a conspicuous place, 585 the barbershop license and each individual licenseeâs 586 certificate. 587 (11)(a)âThe department shall adopt rules governing the 588 licensure, operation, and inspection of mobile barbershops, 589 including their facilities, personnel, and safety and sanitary 590 requirements. 591 (b)âA mobile barbershop shall comply with all licensure and 592 operating requirements specified in this chapter, chapter 455, 593 or rules of the department which apply to barbershops at fixed 594 locations, except to the extent that such requirements conflict 595 with this subsection or rules adopted pursuant to this 596 subsection. 597 (c)âA mobile barbershop shall maintain a permanent business 598 address, located in the inspection area of the local department 599 office, at which records of appointments, itineraries, employee 600 license numbers, and vehicle identification number of any 601 vehicle used by the licenseholder as a mobile barbershop must be 602 kept and made available for verification purposes by department 603 personnel, and at which correspondence from the department can 604 be received. 605 (d)âTo facilitate periodic inspections of a mobile 606 barbershop, before the beginning of each month each mobile 607 barbershop licenseholder shall file with the department a 608 written monthly itinerary listing the locations where and the 609 dates and hours when the mobile barbershop will be operating. 610 (e)âA licenseholder shall comply with all local laws and 611 ordinances regulating business establishments, with all 612 applicable requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act 613 relating to accommodations for persons with disabilities, and 614 with all applicable requirements of the Occupational Safety and 615 Health Administration. 616 Section 14.âSection 476.188, Florida Statutes, is amended 617 to read: 618 476.188âBarber services to be performed in a licensed 619 registered barbershop; exception.â 620 (1)âBarber services shall be performed only by licensed 621 barbers in registered barbershops, except as otherwise provided 622 in this section. 623 (2)âPursuant to rules established by the board, barber 624 services may be performed by a licensed barber in a location 625 other than a licensed registered barbershop, including, but not 626 limited to, a nursing home, hospital, or residence, when a 627 client for reasons of ill health is unable to go to a licensed 628 registered barbershop. Arrangements for the performance of 629 barber services in a location other than a licensed registered 630 barbershop must shall be made only through a licensed registered 631 barbershop. However, a barber may shampoo, cut, or arrange hair 632 in a location other than a licensed registered barbershop 633 without such arrangements. 634 (3)âAny person who holds a valid barberâs license in any 635 state or who is authorized to practice barbering in any country, 636 territory, or jurisdiction of the United States may perform 637 barber services in a location other than a licensed registered 638 barbershop when such services are performed in connection with 639 the motion picture, fashion photography, theatrical, or 640 television industry; a manufacturer trade show demonstration; or 641 an educational seminar. 642 (4)âPursuant to rules adopted by the department, the 643 practice of barbering may be performed in a location other than 644 a licensed barbershop when performed in connection with a 645 special event and performed by a person who holds the proper 646 license. 647 Section 15.âSubsections (2), (3), and (6) of section 648 477.015, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 649 477.015âBoard of Cosmetology.â 650 (2)âFour Five members of the board shall be licensed 651 cosmetologists and shall have been engaged in the practice of 652 cosmetology in this state for not less than 5 years, two members 653 must be registered as specialists in any specialty practice 654 within the practice of cosmetology, and one member must. Two 655 members of the board shall be a layperson laypersons. Each board 656 member shall be a resident of this state and shall have been a 657 resident of this state for not less than 5 continuous years. 658 (3)âThe Governor may at any time fill vacancies on the 659 board for the remainder of unexpired terms. Each member of the 660 board shall hold over after the expiration of his or her term 661 until a successor is duly appointed and qualified. No board 662 member shall serve more than two consecutive terms, whether full 663 or partial. 664 (6)âThe board shall hold such meetings during the year as 665 it may determine to be necessary, one of which shall be the 666 annual meeting. The chair of the board shall have the authority 667 to call other meetings at his or her discretion. A quorum of the 668 board shall consist of not less than four members. 669 Section 16.âSubsections (3) and (4) of section 481.213, 670 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 671 481.213âLicensure and registration.â 672 (3)âThe board shall certify as qualified for a license by 673 endorsement as an architect or registration as a registered 674 interior designer an applicant who: 675 (a)âQualifies to take the prescribed licensure or 676 registration examination, and has passed the prescribed 677 licensure or registration examination or a substantially 678 equivalent examination in another jurisdiction, as set forth in 679 s. 481.209 for architects or registered interior designers, as 680 applicable, and has satisfied the internship requirements set 681 forth in s. 481.211 for architects; 682 (b)âHolds a valid license to practice architecture or a 683 license, registration, or certification to practice interior 684 design issued by another jurisdiction of the United States, if 685 the criteria for issuance of such license were substantially 686 equivalent to the licensure criteria that existed in this state 687 at the time the license was issued; or 688 (c)âHas passed the prescribed licensure examination and 689 Holds a valid certificate issued by the National Council of 690 Architectural Registration Boards, and holds a valid license to 691 practice architecture issued by another state, another or 692 jurisdiction of the United States, or a foreign jurisdiction 693 approved by the board. 694 695 An architect who is licensed in another state, another 696 jurisdiction of the United States, or a foreign jurisdiction 697 approved by the board who seeks qualification for licensure 698 license by endorsement under this subsection must complete a 2 699 hour class approved by the board on wind mitigation techniques. 700 (4)âThe board may refuse to certify any applicant who has 701 violated any of the provisions of s. 481.223, s. 481.225, or s. 702 481.2251, as applicable. 703 Section 17.âSubsection (5) of section 489.107, Florida 704 Statutes, is amended to read: 705 489.107âConstruction Industry Licensing Board.â 706 (5)âFifty-one percent or more of the appointed Five members 707 of Division I constitute a quorum, and 51 percent or more of the 708 appointed five members of Division II constitute a quorum. The 709 combined divisions shall meet together at such times as the 710 board deems necessary, but neither division, nor any committee 711 thereof, may shall take action on any matter under the 712 jurisdiction of the other division. However, if either division 713 is unable to obtain a quorum for the purpose of conducting 714 disciplinary proceedings, it may request members of the other 715 division, who are otherwise qualified to serve on the division 716 unable to obtain a quorum, to join in its deliberations. Such 717 additional members shall vote and count toward a quorum only 718 during those disciplinary proceedings. 719 Section 18.âSubsection (4) of section 489.111, Florida 720 Statutes, is amended to read: 721 489.111âLicensure by examination.â 722 (4)âThe department shall ensure that a sensitivity review 723 committee has been established including representatives of 724 various ethnic/minority groups. No question found by this 725 committee to be discriminatory against any ethnic/minority group 726 shall be included in the examination. 727 Section 19.âSubsection (3) of section 489.115, Florida 728 Statutes, is amended to read: 729 489.115âCertification and registration; endorsement; 730 reciprocity; renewals; continuing education.â 731 (3)âThe board shall certify as qualified for certification 732 by endorsement any applicant who: 733 (a)âMeets the requirements for certification as set forth 734 in this section; has passed a national, regional, state, or 735 United States territorial licensing examination that is 736 substantially equivalent to the examination required by this 737 part; and has satisfied the requirements set forth in s. 738 489.111; 739 (b)âHolds a valid license to practice contracting issued by 740 another state or territory of the United States, if the criteria 741 for issuance of such license were substantially equivalent to 742 Floridaâs current certification criteria; 743 (c)âHolds a valid, current license to practice contracting 744 issued by another state or territory of the United States, if 745 the state or territory has entered into a reciprocal agreement 746 with the board for the recognition of contractor licenses issued 747 in that state, based on criteria for the issuance of such 748 licenses that are substantially equivalent to the criteria for 749 certification in this state; or 750 (d)âHas held a valid, current license to practice 751 contracting issued by another state or territory of the United 752 States, or a county or municipality within a state or territory 753 of the United States, for at least 10 years before the date of 754 application and is applying for the same or similar license in 755 this state, subject to subsections (5)-(9). The board may 756 consider an applicantâs technical competence to ensure the 757 applicant is able to meet the requirements of this stateâs codes 758 and standards for wind mitigation and water intrusion. The board 759 may also consider whether such applicant has had a license to 760 practice contracting revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted 761 against by the licensing authority of another state, territory, 762 county, municipality, or country. Such application must be made 763 either when the license in another state, or territory, county, 764 or municipality is active or within 2 years after such license 765 was last active. Division I contractors and roofing contractors 766 must complete a 2-hour course on the Florida Building Code which 767 includes information on wind mitigation techniques. The required 768 courses may be completed online. 769 Section 20.âSubsection (5) of section 489.511, Florida 770 Statutes, is amended to read: 771 489.511âCertification; application; examinations; 772 endorsement.â 773 (5)âThe board shall certify as qualified for certification 774 by endorsement any individual applying for certification who: 775 (a)âMeets the requirements for certification as set forth 776 in this section; has passed a national, regional, state, or 777 United States territorial licensing examination that is 778 substantially equivalent to the examination required by this 779 part; and has satisfied the requirements set forth in s. 780 489.521; 781 (b)âHolds a valid license to practice electrical or alarm 782 system contracting issued by another state or territory of the 783 United States, if the criteria for issuance of such license were 784 substantially equivalent to the certification criteria that 785 existed in this state at the time the certificate was issued; or 786 (c)âHas held a valid, current license to practice 787 electrical or alarm system contracting issued by another state 788 or territory of the United States, or a county or municipality 789 of a state or territory of the United States, for at least 10 790 years before the date of application and is applying for the 791 same or similar license in this state, subject to ss. 489.510 792 and 489.521(3)(a) and subparagraph (1)(b)1. Such application 793 must be made either when the license in another state or 794 territory, or a county or municipality of a state or territory 795 of the United States, is active or within 2 years after such 796 license was last active. Electrical contractors and alarm system 797 contractors must complete a 2-hour course on the Florida 798 Building Code. The required courses may be completed online. 799 Section 21.âParagraph (c) of subsection (5), paragraph (l) 800 of subsection (8), paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (9), and 801 subsection (15) of section 499.012, Florida Statutes, are 802 amended to read: 803 499.012âPermit application requirements.â 804 (5) 805 (c)âAt least 90 days before the expiration date of a 806 permit, the department shall forward via electronic mail a 807 permit renewal notification to the permittee at the electronic 808 mailing address of the permitted establishment on file with the 809 department. The permit renewal notification must state 810 conspicuously the date on which the permit for the establishment 811 will expire and that the establishment may not operate unless 812 the permit for the establishment is renewed timely. 813 (8)âAn application for a permit or to renew a permit for a 814 prescription drug wholesale distributor or an out-of-state 815 prescription drug wholesale distributor submitted to the 816 department must include: 817 (l)âThe name of each of the applicantâs designated 818 representatives as required by subsection (15), together with 819 the personal information statement and fingerprints required 820 pursuant to subsection (9) for each such person. 821 (9)(a)âEach person required by subsection (8) or subsection 822 (15) to provide a personal information statement and 823 fingerprints shall provide the following information to the 824 department on forms prescribed by the department: 825 1.âThe personâs places of residence for the past 7 years. 826 2.âThe personâs date and place of birth. 827 3.âThe personâs occupations, positions of employment, and 828 offices held during the past 7 years. 829 4.âThe principal business and address of any business, 830 corporation, or other organization in which each such office of 831 the person was held or in which each such occupation or position 832 of employment was carried on. 833 5.âWhether the person has been, during the past 7 years, 834 the subject of any proceeding for the revocation of any license 835 and, if so, the nature of the proceeding and the disposition of 836 the proceeding. 837 6.âWhether, during the past 7 years, the person has been 838 enjoined, temporarily or permanently, by a court of competent 839 jurisdiction from violating any federal or state law regulating 840 the possession, control, or distribution of prescription drugs, 841 together with details concerning any such event. 842 7.âA description of any involvement by the person with any 843 business, including any investments, other than the ownership of 844 stock in a publicly traded company or mutual fund, during the 845 past 4 years, which manufactured, administered, prescribed, 846 distributed, or stored pharmaceutical products and any lawsuits 847 in which such businesses were named as a party. 848 8.âA description of any felony criminal offense of which 849 the person, as an adult, was found guilty, regardless of whether 850 adjudication of guilt was withheld or whether the person pled 851 guilty or nolo contendere. A criminal offense committed in 852 another jurisdiction which would have been a felony in this 853 state must be reported. If the person indicates that a criminal 854 conviction is under appeal and submits a copy of the notice of 855 appeal of that criminal offense, the applicant must, within 15 856 days after the disposition of the appeal, submit to the 857 department a copy of the final written order of disposition. 858 9.âA photograph of the person taken in the previous 180 859 days. 860 10.âA set of fingerprints for the person on a form and 861 under procedures specified by the department, together with 862 payment of an amount equal to the costs incurred by the 863 department for the criminal record check of the person. 864 11.âThe name, address, occupation, and date and place of 865 birth for each member of the personâs immediate family who is 18 866 years of age or older. As used in this subparagraph, the term 867 âmember of the personâs immediate familyâ includes the personâs 868 spouse, children, parents, siblings, the spouses of the personâs 869 children, and the spouses of the personâs siblings. 870 12.âAny other relevant information that the department 871 requires. 872 (d)âFor purposes of applying for renewal of a permit under 873 subsection (8) or certification under subsection (15), a person 874 may submit the following in lieu of satisfying the requirements 875 of paragraphs (a), (b), and (c): 876 1.âA photograph of the individual taken within 180 days; 877 and 878 2.âA copy of the personal information statement form most 879 recently submitted to the department and a certification under 880 oath, on a form specified by the department, that the individual 881 has reviewed the previously submitted personal information 882 statement form and that the information contained therein 883 remains unchanged. 884 (15)(a)âEach establishment that is issued an initial or 885 renewal permit as a prescription drug wholesale distributor or 886 an out-of-state prescription drug wholesale distributor must 887 designate in writing to the department at least one natural 888 person to serve as the designated representative of the 889 wholesale distributor. Such person must have an active 890 certification as a designated representative from the 891 department. 892 (b)âTo be certified as a designated representative, a 893 natural person must: 894 1.âSubmit an application on a form furnished by the 895 department and pay the appropriate fees. 896 2.âBe at least 18 years of age. 897 3.âHave at least 2 years of verifiable full-time: 898 a.âWork experience in a pharmacy licensed in this state or 899 another state, where the personâs responsibilities included, but 900 were not limited to, recordkeeping for prescription drugs; 901 b.âManagerial experience with a prescription drug wholesale 902 distributor licensed in this state or in another state; 903 c.âManagerial experience with the United States Armed 904 Forces, where the personâs responsibilities included, but were 905 not limited to, recordkeeping, warehousing, distributing, or 906 other logistics services pertaining to prescription drugs; 907 d.âManagerial experience with a state or federal 908 organization responsible for regulating or permitting 909 establishments involved in the distribution of prescription 910 drugs, whether in an administrative or a sworn law enforcement 911 capacity; or 912 e.âWork experience as a drug inspector or investigator with 913 a state or federal organization, whether in an administrative or 914 a sworn law enforcement capacity, where the personâs 915 responsibilities related primarily to compliance with state or 916 federal requirements pertaining to the distribution of 917 prescription drugs. 918 4.âReceive a passing score of at least 75 percent on an 919 examination given by the department regarding federal laws 920 governing distribution of prescription drugs and this part and 921 the rules adopted by the department governing the wholesale 922 distribution of prescription drugs. This requirement shall be 923 effective 1 year after the results of the initial examination 924 are mailed to the persons that took the examination. The 925 department shall offer such examinations at least four times 926 each calendar year. 927 5.âProvide the department with a personal information 928 statement and fingerprints pursuant to subsection (9). 929 (c)âThe department may deny an application for 930 certification as a designated representative or may suspend or 931 revoke a certification of a designated representative pursuant 932 to s. 499.067. 933 (d)âA designated representative: 934 1.âMust be actively involved in and aware of the actual 935 daily operation of the wholesale distributor. 936 2.âMust be employed full time in a managerial position by 937 the wholesale distributor. 938 3.âMust be physically present at the establishment during 939 normal business hours, except for time periods when absent due 940 to illness, family illness or death, scheduled vacation, or 941 other authorized absence. 942 4.âMay serve as a designated representative for only one 943 wholesale distributor at any one time. 944 (e)âA wholesale distributor must notify the department when 945 a designated representative leaves the employ of the wholesale 946 distributor. Such notice must be provided to the department 947 within 10 business days after the last day of designated 948 representativeâs employment with the wholesale distributor. 949 (f)âA wholesale distributor may not operate under a 950 prescription drug wholesale distributor permit or an out-of 951 state prescription drug wholesale distributor permit for more 952 than 10 business days after the designated representative leaves 953 the employ of the wholesale distributor, unless the wholesale 954 distributor employs another designated representative and 955 notifies the department within 10 business days of the identity 956 of the new designated representative. 957 Section 22.âSubsection (9) of section 499.0121, Florida 958 Statutes, is amended to read: 959 499.0121âStorage and handling of prescription drugs; 960 recordkeeping.âThe department shall adopt rules to implement 961 this section as necessary to protect the public health, safety, 962 and welfare. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to, 963 requirements for the storage and handling of prescription drugs 964 and for the establishment and maintenance of prescription drug 965 distribution records. 966 (9)âRESPONSIBLE PERSONS.âWholesale distributors must 967 establish and maintain lists of officers, directors, managers, 968 designated representatives, and other persons in charge of 969 wholesale drug distribution, storage, and handling, including a 970 description of their duties and a summary of their 971 qualifications. 972 Section 23.âSection 499.01211, Florida Statutes, is 973 repealed. 974 Section 24.âSubsection (9) of section 499.041, Florida 975 Statutes, is amended to read: 976 499.041âSchedule of fees for drug, device, and cosmetic 977 applications and permits, product registrations, and free-sale 978 certificates.â 979 (9)âThe department shall assess each person applying for 980 certification as a designated representative a fee of $150, plus 981 the cost of processing the criminal history record check. 982 Section 25.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 983 499.0661, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 984 499.0661âCease and desist orders; removal of certain 985 persons.â 986 (2)âREMOVAL OF AFFILIATED PARTIES BY THE DEPARTMENT.â 987 (e)1.âThe chief executive officer, designated 988 representative, or the person holding the equivalent office, of 989 a permittee shall promptly notify the department if she or he 990 has actual knowledge that any affiliated party is charged with a 991 felony in a state or federal court. 992 2.âWhenever any affiliated party is charged with a felony 993 in a state or federal court or with the equivalent of a felony 994 in the courts of any foreign country with which the United 995 States maintains diplomatic relations, and the charge alleges 996 violation of any law involving prescription drugs, 997 pharmaceuticals, fraud, theft, or moral turpitude, the 998 department may enter an emergency order suspending the 999 affiliated party or restricting or prohibiting participation by 1000 the affiliated party in the affairs of the particular permittee 1001 or of any other permittee upon service of the order upon the 1002 permittee and the affiliated party charged. The order must 1003 contain notice of opportunity for a hearing pursuant to ss. 1004 120.569 and 120.57, where the affiliated party may request a 1005 postsuspension hearing to show that continued service to or 1006 participation in the affairs of the permittee does not pose a 1007 threat to the public health or the interests of the permittee 1008 and does not threaten to impair public confidence in the 1009 permittee. In accordance with applicable departmental rules, the 1010 department shall notify the affiliated party whether the order 1011 suspending or prohibiting the person from participation in the 1012 affairs of a permittee will be rescinded or otherwise modified. 1013 The emergency order remains in effect, unless otherwise modified 1014 by the department, until the criminal charge is disposed of. The 1015 acquittal of the person charged, or the final, unappealed 1016 dismissal of all charges against the person, dissolves the 1017 emergency order but does not prohibit the department from 1018 instituting proceedings under paragraph (a). If the person 1019 charged is convicted or pleads guilty or nolo contendere, 1020 whether or not an adjudication of guilt is entered by the court, 1021 the emergency order becomes shall become final. 1022 Section 26.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 1023 499.067, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1024 499.067âDenial, suspension, or revocation of permit, 1025 certification, or registration.â 1026 (1) 1027 (b)âThe department may deny an application for a permit or 1028 certification, or suspend or revoke a permit or certification, 1029 if the department finds that: 1030 1.âThe applicant is not of good moral character or that it 1031 would be a danger or not in the best interest of the public 1032 health, safety, and welfare if the applicant were issued a 1033 permit or certification. 1034 2.âThe applicant has not met the requirements for the 1035 permit or certification. 1036 3.âThe applicant is not eligible for a permit or 1037 certification for any of the reasons enumerated in s. 499.012. 1038 4.âThe applicant, permittee, or person certified under s. 1039 499.012(15) demonstrates any of the conditions enumerated in s. 1040 499.012. 1041 5.âThe applicant, permittee, or person certified under s. 1042 499.012(15) has committed any violation of this chapter. 1043 Section 27.âSubsection (1) of section 509.2015, Florida 1044 Statutes, is amended to read: 1045 509.2015âTelephone surcharges by public lodging 1046 establishments.â 1047 (1)âA public lodging establishment which imposes a 1048 surcharge for any telephone call must post notice of such 1049 surcharge in a conspicuous place in each lodging unit that 1050 contains a telephone located by each telephone from which a call 1051 which is subject to a surcharge may originate. Such notice must 1052 be plainly visible and printed on a sign that is not less than 3 1053 inches by 5 inches in size, and such notice shall clearly state 1054 if the surcharge applies whether or not the telephone call has 1055 been attempted or completed. 1056 Section 28.âSubsections (4) and (8) of section 553.73, 1057 Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1058 553.73âFlorida Building Code.â 1059 (4)(a)âAll entities authorized to enforce the Florida 1060 Building Code under s. 553.80 shall comply with applicable 1061 standards for issuance of mandatory certificates of occupancy, 1062 minimum types of inspections, and procedures for plans review 1063 and inspections as established by the commission by rule. Local 1064 governments may adopt amendments to the administrative 1065 provisions of the Florida Building Code, subject to the 1066 limitations in this paragraph subsection. Local amendments to 1067 the administrative provisions of the Florida Building Code must 1068 be more stringent than the minimum standards described in this 1069 section and must be transmitted to the commission within 30 days 1070 after enactment. The local government shall make such amendments 1071 available to the general public in a usable format. The State 1072 Fire Marshal is responsible for establishing the standards and 1073 procedures required in this paragraph subsection for 1074 governmental entities with respect to applying the Florida Fire 1075 Prevention Code and the Life Safety Code. 1076 (b)âLocal governments may, subject to the limitations in 1077 this section and not more than once every 6 months, adopt 1078 amendments to the technical provisions of the Florida Building 1079 Code that apply solely within the jurisdiction of such 1080 government and that provide for more stringent requirements than 1081 those specified in the Florida Building Code. 1082 1.âA local government may adopt technical amendments that 1083 address local needs if: 1084 a.1.âThe local governing body determines, following a 1085 public hearing which has been advertised in a newspaper of 1086 general circulation at least 10 days before the hearing, that 1087 there is a need to strengthen the requirements of the Florida 1088 Building Code. The determination must be based upon a review of 1089 local conditions by the local governing body, which review 1090 demonstrates by evidence or data that the geographical 1091 jurisdiction governed by the local governing body exhibits a 1092 local need to strengthen the Florida Building Code beyond the 1093 needs or regional variation addressed by the Florida Building 1094 Code, that the local need is addressed by the proposed local 1095 amendment, and that the amendment is no more stringent than 1096 necessary to address the local need. 1097 b.2.âSuch additional requirements are not discriminatory 1098 against materials, products, or construction techniques of 1099 demonstrated capabilities. 1100 c.3.âSuch additional requirements do may not introduce a 1101 new subject not addressed in the Florida Building Code. 1102 2.(c)âThe enforcing agency shall make readily available, in 1103 a usable format, all amendments adopted under this section. 1104 3.(d)âAny amendment to the Florida Building Code adopted 1105 under this paragraph must shall be transmitted within 30 days 1106 after adoption by the local government to the commission. The 1107 commission shall maintain copies of all such amendments in a 1108 format that is usable and obtainable by the public. Local 1109 technical amendments are not effective until 30 days after the 1110 amendment has been received and published by the commission. 1111 4.(e)âAn amendment to the Florida Building Code adopted by 1112 a local government under this paragraph subsection is effective 1113 only until the adoption of the new edition of the Florida 1114 Building Code by the commission every third year. At such time, 1115 the commission shall review such amendment for consistency with 1116 the criteria in paragraph (9)(a) and adopt such amendment as 1117 part of the Florida Building Code or rescind the amendment. The 1118 commission shall immediately notify the respective local 1119 government of the rescission of any amendment. After receiving 1120 such notice, the respective local government may readopt the 1121 rescinded amendment under the provisions of this paragraph 1122 subsection. 1123 5.(f)âEach county and municipality desiring to make local 1124 technical amendments to the Florida Building Code shall 1125 establish by interlocal agreement a countywide compliance review 1126 board to review any amendment to the Florida Building Code that 1127 is adopted by a local government within the county under this 1128 paragraph subsection and that is challenged by a substantially 1129 affected party for purposes of determining the amendmentâs 1130 compliance with this paragraph subsection. If challenged, the 1131 local technical amendments are not effective until the time for 1132 filing an appeal under subparagraph 6. paragraph (g) has expired 1133 or, if there is an appeal, until the commission issues its final 1134 order determining if the adopted amendment is in compliance with 1135 this paragraph subsection. 1136 6.(g)âIf the compliance review board determines such 1137 amendment is not in compliance with this paragraph subsection, 1138 the compliance review board must shall notify such local 1139 government of the noncompliance and that the amendment is 1140 invalid and unenforceable until the local government corrects 1141 the amendment to bring it into compliance. The local government 1142 may appeal the decision of the compliance review board to the 1143 commission. If the compliance review board determines that such 1144 amendment is in compliance with this paragraph subsection, any 1145 substantially affected party may appeal such determination to 1146 the commission. Any such appeal must be filed with the 1147 commission within 14 days after the boardâs written 1148 determination. The commission shall promptly refer the appeal to 1149 the Division of Administrative Hearings by electronic means 1150 through the divisionâs website for the assignment of an 1151 administrative law judge. The administrative law judge shall 1152 conduct the required hearing within 30 days after being assigned 1153 to the appeal, and shall enter a recommended order within 30 1154 days after the conclusion of such hearing. The commission shall 1155 enter a final order within 30 days after an order is rendered. 1156 Chapter 120 and the uniform rules of procedure applies shall 1157 apply to such proceedings. The local government adopting the 1158 amendment that is subject to challenge has the burden of proving 1159 that the amendment complies with this paragraph subsection in 1160 proceedings before the compliance review board and the 1161 commission, as applicable. Actions of the commission are subject 1162 to judicial review under s. 120.68. The compliance review board 1163 shall determine whether its decisions apply to a respective 1164 local jurisdiction or apply countywide. 1165 7.(h)âAn amendment adopted under this paragraph subsection 1166 must include a fiscal impact statement that documents the costs 1167 and benefits of the proposed amendment. Criteria for the fiscal 1168 impact statement must shall include the impact to local 1169 government relative to enforcement and the impact to property 1170 and building owners and industry relative to the cost of 1171 compliance. The fiscal impact statement may not be used as a 1172 basis for challenging the amendment for compliance. 1173 (c)(i)âIn addition to paragraphs (f) and (g), The 1174 commission may review any amendment amendments adopted under 1175 this subsection and make nonbinding recommendations related to 1176 compliance of such amendments with this subsection. 1177 (d)(j)âAny amendment adopted by a local enforcing agency 1178 under this subsection may not apply to state or school district 1179 owned buildings, manufactured buildings or factory-built school 1180 buildings approved by the commission, or prototype buildings 1181 approved under s. 553.77(3). The respective responsible entities 1182 shall consider the physical performance parameters 1183 substantiating such amendments when designing, specifying, and 1184 constructing such exempt buildings. 1185 (e)(k)âA technical amendment to the Florida Building Code 1186 related to water conservation practices or design criteria 1187 adopted by a local government under paragraph (b) this 1188 subsection is not void when the code is updated if the technical 1189 amendment is necessary to protect or provide for more efficient 1190 use of water resources as provided in s. 373.621. However, any 1191 such technical amendment carried forward into the next edition 1192 of the code under this paragraph is subject to review or 1193 modification as provided in this part. 1194 (f)(l)âIf a local government adopts a regulation, law, 1195 ordinance, policy, amendment, or land use or zoning provision 1196 without using the process established in this subsection, and a 1197 substantially affected person considers such regulation, law, 1198 ordinance, policy, amendment, or land use or zoning provision to 1199 be a technical amendment to the Florida Building Code, then the 1200 substantially affected person may submit a petition to the 1201 commission for a nonbinding advisory opinion. If a substantially 1202 affected person submits a request in accordance with this 1203 paragraph, the commission must shall issue a nonbinding advisory 1204 opinion stating whether or not the commission interprets the 1205 regulation, law, ordinance, policy, amendment, or land use or 1206 zoning provision as a technical amendment to the Florida 1207 Building Code. As used in this paragraph, the term âlocal 1208 governmentâ means a county, municipality, special district, or 1209 political subdivision of the state. 1210 1.âRequests to review a local government regulation, law, 1211 ordinance, policy, amendment, or land use or zoning provision 1212 may be initiated by any substantially affected person. A 1213 substantially affected person includes an owner or builder 1214 subject to the regulation, law, ordinance, policy, amendment, or 1215 land use or zoning provision, or an association of owners or 1216 builders having members who are subject to the regulation, law, 1217 ordinance, policy, amendment, or land use or zoning provision. 1218 2.âIn order to initiate a review, a substantially affected 1219 person must file a petition with the commission. The commission 1220 shall adopt a form for the petition and directions for filing, 1221 which shall be published on the Building Code Information 1222 System. The form must shall, at a minimum, require the 1223 following: 1224 a.âThe name of the local government that enacted the 1225 regulation, law, ordinance, policy, amendment, or land use or 1226 zoning provision. 1227 b.âThe name and address of the local governmentâs general 1228 counsel or administrator. 1229 c.âThe name, address, and telephone number of the 1230 petitioner; the name, address, and telephone number of the 1231 petitionerâs representative, if any; and an explanation of how 1232 the petitionerâs substantial interests are being affected by the 1233 regulation, law, ordinance, policy, amendment, or land use or 1234 zoning provision. 1235 d.âA statement explaining why the regulation, law, 1236 ordinance, policy, amendment, or land use or zoning provision is 1237 a technical amendment to the Florida Building Code, and which 1238 provisions of the Florida Building Code, if any, are being 1239 amended by the regulation, law, ordinance, policy, amendment, or 1240 land use or zoning provision. 1241 3.âThe petitioner shall serve the petition on the local 1242 governmentâs general counsel or administrator by certified mail, 1243 return receipt requested, and send a copy of the petition to the 1244 commission, in accordance with the commissionâs published 1245 directions. The local government shall respond to the petition 1246 in accordance with the form by certified mail, return receipt 1247 requested, and send a copy of its response to the commission, 1248 within 14 days after receipt of the petition, including 1249 Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays. 1250 4.âUpon receipt of a petition that meets the requirements 1251 of this paragraph, the commission shall publish the petition, 1252 including any response submitted by the local government, on the 1253 Building Code Information System in a manner that allows 1254 interested persons to address the issues by posting comments. 1255 5.âBefore issuing an advisory opinion, the commission shall 1256 consider the petition, the response, and any comments posted on 1257 the Building Code Information System. The commission may also 1258 provide the petition, the response, and any comments posted on 1259 the Building Code Information System to a technical advisory 1260 committee, and may consider any recommendation provided by the 1261 technical advisory committee. The commission shall issue an 1262 advisory opinion stating whether the regulation, law, ordinance, 1263 policy, amendment, or land use or zoning provision is a 1264 technical amendment to the Florida Building Code within 30 days 1265 after the filing of the petition, including Saturdays, Sundays, 1266 and legal holidays. The commission shall publish its advisory 1267 opinion on the Building Code Information System and in the 1268 Florida Administrative Register. The commissionâs advisory 1269 opinion is nonbinding and is not a declaratory statement under 1270 s. 120.565. 1271 (8)âNotwithstanding subsection (3) or subsection (7), The 1272 commission may address issues identified in this subsection by 1273 amending the code under the rule adoption procedures in chapter 1274 120. Updates to the Florida Building Code, including provisions 1275 contained in referenced standards and criteria which relate to 1276 wind resistance or the prevention of water intrusion, may not be 1277 amended under this subsection to diminish those standards; 1278 however, the commission may amend the Florida Building Code to 1279 enhance such standards. Following the approval of any amendments 1280 to the Florida Building Code by the commission and publication 1281 of the amendments on the commissionâs website, authorities 1282 having jurisdiction to enforce the Florida Building Code may 1283 enforce the amendments. 1284 (a)âThe commission may approve amendments that are needed 1285 to address: 1286 1.âConflicts within the updated code; 1287 2.âConflicts between the updated code and the Florida Fire 1288 Prevention Code adopted under chapter 633; 1289 3.âUnintended results from the integration of previously 1290 adopted amendments with the model code; 1291 4.âEquivalency of standards; 1292 5.âChanges to or inconsistencies with federal or state law; 1293 or 1294 6.âAdoption of an updated edition of the National 1295 Electrical Code if the commission finds that delay of 1296 implementing the updated edition causes undue hardship to 1297 stakeholders or otherwise threatens the public health, safety, 1298 and welfare. 1299 (b)âThe commission may issue errata to the code pursuant to 1300 the rule adoption procedures in chapter 120 to list demonstrated 1301 errors in provisions contained within the Florida Building Code. 1302 The determination of such errors and the issuance of errata to 1303 the code must be approved by a 75-percent supermajority vote of 1304 the commission. For purposes of this paragraph, âerrata to the 1305 codeâ means a list of errors on current and previous editions of 1306 the Florida Building Code. 1307 Section 29.âSubsection (3) of section 553.791, Florida 1308 Statutes, is amended to read: 1309 553.791âAlternative plans review and inspection.â 1310 (3)âA private provider and any duly authorized 1311 representative may only perform building code inspection 1312 services that are within the disciplines covered by that 1313 personâs licensure or certification under chapter 468, chapter 1314 471, or chapter 481, including single-trade inspections. 1315 However, a private provider and any duly authorized 1316 representative licensed as a building code administrator may 1317 perform any plan review or inspection requiring licensure or 1318 certification under part XII of chapter 468 if the private 1319 provider or duly authorized representative served for at least 3 1320 consecutive years as a building code administrator authorized by 1321 a municipal or county government to perform any plan review or 1322 inspection requiring licensure or certification under part XII 1323 of chapter 468 and has had no disciplinary action imposed 1324 against his or her license. The department shall adopt rules to 1325 identify those building code administrator licensees who meet 1326 the requirements of this subsection. A private provider may not 1327 provide building code inspection services pursuant to this 1328 section upon any building designed or constructed by the private 1329 provider or the private providerâs firm. 1330 Section 30.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1331 made by this act to section 20.165, Florida Statutes, in a 1332 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 1333 120.54, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1334 120.54âRulemaking.â 1335 (3)âADOPTION PROCEDURES.â 1336 (c)âHearings.â 1337 1.âIf the intended action concerns any rule other than one 1338 relating exclusively to procedure or practice, the agency shall, 1339 on the request of any affected person received within 21 days 1340 after the date of publication of the notice of intended agency 1341 action, give affected persons an opportunity to present evidence 1342 and argument on all issues under consideration. The agency may 1343 schedule a public hearing on the rule and, if requested by any 1344 affected person, shall schedule a public hearing on the rule. 1345 When a public hearing is held, the agency must ensure that staff 1346 are available to explain the agencyâs proposal and to respond to 1347 questions or comments regarding the rule. If the agency head is 1348 a board or other collegial body created under s. 20.165(4) or s. 1349 20.43(3)(g), and one or more requested public hearings is 1350 scheduled, the board or other collegial body shall conduct at 1351 least one of the public hearings itself and may not delegate 1352 this responsibility without the consent of those persons 1353 requesting the public hearing. Any material pertinent to the 1354 issues under consideration submitted to the agency within 21 1355 days after the date of publication of the notice or submitted to 1356 the agency between the date of publication of the notice and the 1357 end of the final public hearing shall be considered by the 1358 agency and made a part of the record of the rulemaking 1359 proceeding. 1360 2.âRulemaking proceedings shall be governed solely by the 1361 provisions of this section unless a person timely asserts that 1362 the personâs substantial interests will be affected in the 1363 proceeding and affirmatively demonstrates to the agency that the 1364 proceeding does not provide adequate opportunity to protect 1365 those interests. If the agency determines that the rulemaking 1366 proceeding is not adequate to protect the personâs interests, it 1367 shall suspend the rulemaking proceeding and convene a separate 1368 proceeding under the provisions of ss. 120.569 and 120.57. 1369 Similarly situated persons may be requested to join and 1370 participate in the separate proceeding. Upon conclusion of the 1371 separate proceeding, the rulemaking proceeding shall be resumed. 1372 Section 31.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1373 made by this act to section 20.165, Florida Statutes, in 1374 references thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) and 1375 paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 120.74, Florida 1376 Statutes, are reenacted to read: 1377 120.74âAgency annual rulemaking and regulatory plans; 1378 reports.â 1379 (2)âPUBLICATION AND DELIVERY TO THE COMMITTEE.â 1380 (b)âTo satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a), a board 1381 established under s. 20.165(4), and any other board or 1382 commission receiving administrative support from the Department 1383 of Business and Professional Regulation, may coordinate with the 1384 Department of Business and Professional Regulation, and a board 1385 established under s. 20.43(3)(g) may coordinate with the 1386 Department of Health, for inclusion of the boardâs or 1387 commissionâs plan and notice of publication in the coordinating 1388 departmentâs plan and notice and for the delivery of the 1389 required documentation to the committee. 1390 (3)âDEPARTMENT REVIEW OF BOARD PLAN.âBy October 15 of each 1391 year: 1392 (a)âFor each board established under s. 20.165(4) and any 1393 other board or commission receiving administrative support from 1394 the Department of Business and Professional Regulation, the 1395 Department of Business and Professional Regulation shall file 1396 with the committee a certification that the department has 1397 reviewed each boardâs and commissionâs regulatory plan. A 1398 certification may relate to more than one board or commission. 1399 Section 32.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1400 made by this act to section 326.001, Florida Statutes, in 1401 references thereto, section 326.003, Florida Statutes, is 1402 reenacted to read: 1403 326.003âAdministration.âThe division shall: 1404 (1)âAdminister ss. 326.001-326.006 and collect fees 1405 sufficient to administer ss. 326.001-326.006. 1406 (2)âAdopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to 1407 implement ss. 326.001-326.006 and to classify brokers and 1408 salespersons and regulate their activities. 1409 (3)âEnforce the provisions of ss. 326.001-326.006 against 1410 any person who operates as a broker or salesperson without a 1411 license. 1412 Section 33.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1413 made by this act to section 326.001, Florida Statutes, in 1414 references thereto, subsection (5) and paragraph (b) of 1415 subsection (7) of section 326.004, Florida Statutes, are 1416 reenacted to read: 1417 326.004âLicensing.â 1418 (5)âThe division by rule shall establish fees for 1419 application, initial licensing, biennial renewal, and 1420 reinstatement of licenses in an amount not to exceed $500. The 1421 fees must be set in an amount that is adequate to 1422 proportionately fund the expenses of the division in ss. 1423 326.001-326.006. 1424 (7) 1425 (b)âSurety bonds and irrevocable letters of credit must be 1426 in a form to be approved by the division and must be conditioned 1427 upon the broker complying with the terms of any written contract 1428 made by such broker in connection with the sale or exchange of 1429 any yacht or ship and not violating any of the provisions of the 1430 Yacht and Ship Brokersâ Act in the conduct of the business for 1431 which he or she is licensed. The bonds and letters of credit 1432 must be delivered to the division and in favor of any person in 1433 a transaction who suffers any loss as a result of any violation 1434 of the conditions in ss. 326.001-326.006. When the division 1435 determines that a person has incurred a loss as a result of a 1436 violation of the Yacht and Ship Brokersâ Act, it shall notify 1437 the person in writing of the existence of the bond or letter of 1438 credit. The bonds and letters of credit must cover the license 1439 period, and a new bond or letter of credit or a proper 1440 continuation certificate must be delivered to the division at 1441 the beginning of each license period. However, the aggregate 1442 liability of the surety in any one year may not exceed the sum 1443 of the bond or, in the case of a letter of credit, the aggregate 1444 liability of the issuing bank may not exceed the sum of the 1445 credit. 1446 1447 The security for a broker must remain on deposit for a period of 1448 1 year after he or she ceases to be a broker. 1449 Section 34.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1450 made by this act to section 499.012, Florida Statutes, in a 1451 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 499.003, Florida 1452 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1453 499.003âDefinitions of terms used in this part.âAs used in 1454 this part, the term: 1455 (4)ââAffiliated partyâ means: 1456 (a)âA director, officer, trustee, partner, or committee 1457 member of a permittee or applicant or a subsidiary or service 1458 corporation of the permittee or applicant; 1459 (b)âA person who, directly or indirectly, manages, 1460 controls, or oversees the operation of a permittee or applicant, 1461 regardless of whether such person is a partner, shareholder, 1462 manager, member, officer, director, independent contractor, or 1463 employee of the permittee or applicant; 1464 (c)âA person who has filed or is required to file a 1465 personal information statement pursuant to s. 499.012(9) or is 1466 required to be identified in an application for a permit or to 1467 renew a permit pursuant to s. 499.012(8); or 1468 (d)âThe five largest natural shareholders that own at least 1469 5 percent of the permittee or applicant. 1470 Section 35.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.